Utah statutes.
31A-15-212.   Duty of producers to obtain license -- Risk retention groups
-- Purchasing groups.
(1)  A person may do the following only if he is licensed as an insurance
agent or broker or is exempt from licensure under Title 31A, Chapter 23a,
Insurance Marketing - Licensing Producers, Consultants, and Reinsurance
Intermediaries:
(a)  solicit, negotiate, or procure liability insurance in this state from a
risk retention group;
(b)  solicit, negotiate, or procure liability insurance in this state for a
purchasing group from an authorized insurer or a risk retention group; and
(c)  solicit, negotiate, or procure liability insurance coverage in this state
for any member of a purchasing group under a purchasing group's policy.
(2)  A person may solicit, negotiate, or procure liability insurance from an
insurer not authorized to do business in this state on behalf of a purchasing
group located in this state  only if he is licensed as a surplus lines
producer or is exempt from licensure under Title 31A, Chapter 23a, Insurance
Marketing - Licensing Producers, Consultants, and Reinsurance Intermediaries.
(3)  The requirement of residence in this state does not apply for purposes of
acting as a producer for a risk retention group or purchasing group under
Subsections (1) and (2).
(4)  On business placed with a risk retention group or written through a
purchasing group, each person licensed under this title shall provide to each
prospective insured the notice required by Subsection 31A-15-204(7) in the
case of a risk retention group, and by Subsection 31A-15-209(1) in the case of
a purchasing group.
(5)  Solicitation for membership in a purchasing group is not of itself a
solicitation for insurance.
